Utah statutes.
31A-16-101.   Scope and purpose of chapter.
(1)  This chapter applies to all persons doing an insurance business in Utah.
(2)  The purposes of this chapter include:
(a)  exercising surveillance over the acquisition of a domestic insurer, to
ensure that in the process of making it part of an insurance holding company
system, the interests of policyholders, shareholders, and the public are not
harmed;
(b)  providing the regulatory monitoring of those intercorporate relationships
and transactions among affiliates within an insurance holding company system
that may affect the solidity of insurers;
(c)  controlling the payment of dividends that might affect the solidity of
insurers; and
(d)  providing, in appropriate cases, recoupment of dividends paid.
